src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON GUOKTELOGIGOLBMA   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#golbma K ;
golbma+Num+Ess:e#logi#golbma%>n K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#golbma K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#golmma K ;
golbma+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#golmma NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#golmma%>s K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#golmma%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#golbmi%>j K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#golmma K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#golmma K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#golmma%>t K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#golmma%>jde K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#guvtti%>jguin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGIGOLBMA   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
golbma+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta#logi#golbma K ;
golbma+Num+Ess:htta#logi#golbma%>n K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#golbma K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#golmma K ;
golbma+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#golmma NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#golmma%>s K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#golmma%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
golbma+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#golbmi%>j K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#golmma K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#golmma K ;
golbma+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#golmma%>t K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#golbma%>X5jd K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#golmma%>jde K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#golmma%>jn K ;
golbma+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#golmma%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#njeallje K ;
njeallje+Num+Ess:#logi#njeallji%>n K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#njeallje K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#njealje NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#njealji%>s K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#njealji%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#njealljá%>j K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#njealji%>t K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#njelji%>jde K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#njelji%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#njeallje K ;
njeallje+Num+Ess:#logi#njeallji%>n K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#njeallje K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#njealje NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#njealji%>s K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#njealji%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#njealljá%>j K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#njealji%>t K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#njelji%>jde K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#njelji%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGINJEALLJE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#njeallje K ;
njeallje+Num+Ess:e#logi#njeallji%>n K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#njeallje K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#njealje NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#njealji%>s K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#njealji%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#njealljá%>j K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#njealji%>t K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#njelji%>jde K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#njelji%>guin K ;

LEXICON VIHTTALOGINJEALLJE   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
njeallje+Num+Sg+Nom:ihtta#logi#njeallje K ;
njeallje+Num+Ess:htta#logi#njeallji%>n K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Acc:htta#logi#njeallje K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Gen:htta#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Cmp/SgGen:htta#logi#njealje NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc:htta#logi#njealji%>s K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:htta#logi#njealji%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill:htta#logi#njealljá%>j K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:htta#logi#njealji K ;
njeallje+Num+Sg+Com:đa%>jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Nom:htta#logi#njealji%>t K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Acc:htta#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Gen:htta#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:htta#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:htta#logi#njelji%>X5jd K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Ill:htta#logi#njelji%>jde K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Loc:đa%>jn#logijn#njelji%>jn K ;
njeallje+Num+Pl+Com:htta#logi#njelji%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:#logi#vihtta K ;
vihtta+Num+Ess:#logi#vihtta%>n K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#vihtta K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#viđa K ;
vihtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#viđa NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#viđa%>s K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#viđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#vihtti%>j K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#viđa K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#viđa K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#viđa%>t K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#viđa%>jde K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#viđa%>jguin K ;

LEXICON GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:%>X4#logi#vihtta K ;
vihtta+Num+Ess:#logi#vihttan K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:#logi#vihtta K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:#logi#viđa K ;
vihtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:#logi#viđa NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:#logi#viđa%>s K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:#logi#viđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:#logi#vihtti%>j K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:#logi#viđa K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:#logi#viđa K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:#logi#viđa%>t K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:#logi#viđa%>jde K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:#logi#viđa%>jguin K ;


LEXICON GUOKTELOGIVIHTTA   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
vihtta+Num+Sg+Nom:e#logi#vihtta K ;
vihtta+Num+Ess:e#logi#vihtta%>n K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Acc:e#logi#vihtta K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Gen:e#logi#viđa K ;
vihtta+Num+Cmp/SgGen:e#logi#viđa NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc:e#logi#viđa%>s K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:e#logi#viđa%>n K ;     ! !SOUTH
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill:e#logi#vihtti%>j K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:e#logi#viđa K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:e#logi#viđa K ;
vihtta+Num+Sg+Com:i%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Nom:e#logi#viđa%>t K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Acc:e#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Gen:e#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:e#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com+Attr:e#logi#viđa%>X5jd K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Ill:e#logi#viđa%>jde K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Loc:i%>X5jn#logijn#viđa%>jn K ;
vihtta+Num+Pl+Com:e#logi#viđa%>guin K ;

LEXICON 21TO99   !!≈ * __@CODE@__
guoktelogi:guok't GUOKTELOGIGOLBMA ;
guoktelogi:guok't GUOKTELOGINJEALLJE ;
guoktelogi:guok't GUOKTELOGIVIHTTA ;
golbmalogi:golbma GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE ;
golbmalogi:golbma GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA ;
njealljelogi:njeallj GUOKTELOGIGOLBMA ;
njealljelogi:njeallj GUOKTELOGINJEALLJE ;
njealljelogi:njeallj GUOKTELOGIVIHTTA ;
vihttalogi:vi VIHTTALOGIGOLBMA ;
vihttalogi:vi VIHTTALOGINJEALLJE ;
guhttalogi:gu VIHTTALOGIGOLBMA ;
guhttalogi:gu VIHTTALOGINJEALLJE ;
čiežalogi:čieža GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE ;
giežalogi:gieža GOLBMALOGINJEALLJE ;
čiežalogi:čieža GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA ;
giežalogi:gieža GOLBMALOGIVIHTTA ;
gávccilogi:gávcci GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE ;
gávccilogi:gávcci GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA ;
ovccilogi:ovcci GAVCCILOGINJEALLJE ;
ovccilogi:ovcci GAVCCILOGIVIHTTA ;
